Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.210

Tax Reform Act of 1969, state implementation—Trust instruments deemed to contain prohibiting provisions.

The trust instrument of each trust to which RCW 11.110.200 through 11.110.260 applies shall be deemed to contain provisions prohibiting the trustee from:

(1) Engaging in any act of "self-dealing," as defined in section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4941(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(2) Retaining any "excess business holdings," as defined in section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4943(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(3) Making any investments which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4944(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

(4) Making any "taxable expenditures," as defined in section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4945(a) of the Internal Revenue Code:

PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply either to those split-interest trusts or to amounts thereof which are not subject to the prohibitions applicable to private foundations by reason of the provisions of section 4947 of the Internal Revenue Code.

[ 1993 c 73 s 7; 1985 c 30 s 130. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 162; 1971 c 58 s 2. Formerly RCW 19.10.210.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.